District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0704.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Public Trust in Utility Regulation Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this act, the term:
(1) “Capital expenditure” means an expenditure for a utility project, investment,
facility, equipment, or other asset, including upfront capital costs and financing costs, that an
electric company or gas company proposes to capitalize and recover from ratepayers through
rates, charges, riders, surcharges, or any other cost-recovery mechanism approved by the
Commission.
(2) “Commission” means the Public Service Commission of the District of
Columbia.

(3) “Electric company” shall have the same meaning as provided in paragraph 1
of section 8 of An Act Making appropriations to provide for the expenses of the government of
the District of Columbia for the fiscal year ending June thirtieth, nineteen hundred and fourteen,
and for other purposes, approved March 4, 1913 (37 Stat. 976; D.C. Official Code § 34-207).
(4) “Gas company” shall have the same meaning as provided in paragraph 1 of
section 8 of An Act Making appropriations to provide for the expenses of the government of the
District of Columbia for the fiscal year ending June thirtieth, nineteen hundred and fourteen, and
for other purposes, approved March 4, 1913 (37 Stat. 975; D.C. Official Code § 34-209).
(5) “Public utility” shall have the same meaning as provided in paragraph 1 of
section 8 of An Act Making appropriations to provide for the expenses of the government of the
District of Columbia for the fiscal year ending June thirtieth, nineteen hundred and fourteen, and
for other purposes, approved March 4, 1913 (37 Stat. 974; D.C. Official Code § 34-214).
Sec. 3. Consideration of capital expenditures in rate proceedings.
(a) As a separate and distinct part of any filing by an electric or gas company proposing a
change in rates pursuant to paragraph 94 of section 8 of An Act Making appropriations to
provide for the expenses of the government of the District of Columbia for the fiscal year ending
June thirtieth, nineteen hundred and fourteen, and for other purposes, approved March 4, 1913
(37 Stat. 994; D.C. Official Code § 34-901) or paragraph 24 of section 8 of An Act Making
appropriations to provide for the expenses of the government of the District of Columbia for the
fiscal year ending June thirtieth, nineteen hundred and fourteen, and for other purposes, approved
March 4, 1913 (37 Stat. 981; D.C. Official Code § 34-1123), the electric or gas company shall
provide a detailed description of any proposed capital expenditure to be considered in the
proceeding.

(b) The description required by subsection (a) of this section shall be provided on a per-
project basis and shall include:
(1) The purpose of and the specific necessity for each proposed capital
expenditure;
(2) The total estimated cost of the project;
(3) The expected period of usefulness or asset life of the investment;
(4) The specific location of the project within the District;
(5) The rationale for including the expenditure in the current rate proceeding; and
(6) The anticipated benefits to ratepayers and the impact on the safety and
reliability of the distribution system.
(c) The Commission shall post the per-project descriptions required by this section on its
public website within 7 days of the electric or gas company’s filing.
(d) In any proceeding involving a change in rates, the burden of proof to show that the
proposed rate change related to each specific capital expenditure shall be on the electric or gas
company.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or restrict the existing statutory
powers or regulatory authority of the Commission.
Sec. 4. Commission to conduct regular audits of public utilities.
(a) Beginning at the end of the fiscal year of the effective date of this act, and every three
years thereafter, the Commission shall conduct a regular audit of each public utility, including:
(1) Market information;
(2) Quality of services and customer satisfaction;
(3) Utility financial information, including:

(A) Valuation schedules,
(B) Capital expenditures and depreciation schedules, and
(C) Operational and other expenses;
(4) Societal impact data;
(5) Affiliate transaction information;
(6) Cost of equity;
(7) Cost of debt; and
(8) Any additional information as deemed appropriate by the Commission.
(b) The information collected during this audit shall be transmitted to the Department of
Energy and Environment and the Council within 30 days.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or, in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).